Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 51
ANIMAL BIOLOGICAL PRODUCTS

Section

35-51-101. Manufacturer required to have federal license.

Any person, firm, or corporation operating a plant or laboratory in this state for the manufacture of animal biological products, including animal serums, vaccines, bacterins, and animal virus, offered for sale and recommended by the manufacturer for the treatment or prevention of infectious or contagious animal diseases shall secure from the United States department of agriculture, bureau of animal industry, division of serum-virus control, a federal license authorizing the manufacture of said veterinary biological products and their sale in interstate commerce. This article shall not apply to the manufacture or sale of animal biological products manufactured under United States veterinary license or produced by the United States department of agriculture, bureau of animal industry.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 94, § 1.

CSA:

C. 58, § 75.

CRS 53:

§ 48-7-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 48-6-1.

Editor's note:

The functions of the bureau of animal industry were transferred to the secretary of agriculture by the federal reorganization plan of 1947, 61 Stat. 952.

35-51-102. Penalty for violation.

It is unlawful to manufacture or sell animal biological products as defined in section 35-51-101, except in compliance with the provisions of this article 51, and any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this article 51 commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 94, § 2.

CSA:

C. 58, § 76.

CRS 53:

§ 48-7-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 48-6-2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3284, § 649, effective March 1, 2022.

35-51-103. Civil penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or of any rule adopted pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction or the commissioner. The penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per violation; except that such penalty may be doubled if it is determined, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, that the person has violated the provision or rule on at least one prior occasion occurring after March 23, 1995.

No civil penalty may be imposed by the commissioner unless the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect the civil penalty, or if any person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may bring suit to recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees by action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Before imposing any civil penalty, the court or the commissioner may consider the effect of such penalty on the person charged.

All penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the general fund.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 66, § 3, effective March 23.

35-51-104. Enforcement.

The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this article.

Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe a violation of any provision of this article or any rule made pursuant to this article has occurred and immediate enforcement is deemed necessary, the commissioner may issue an order requiring any person to cease and desist from such violation. Such cease-and-desist order shall set forth the provisions alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to have constituted the violation, and the requirement that all actions cease immediately. At any time after service of the order to cease and desist, the person may request a prompt hearing to determine whether or not such violation has occurred. Such hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and shall be determined promptly.

Whenever the commissioner possesses evidence satisfactory to the commissioner that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this article or of any rule adopted under this article, the commissioner may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any rule or order under this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 68, § 3, effective March 23.